Illinois, session 104th, HB2962.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Sections 6-106.1 and 11-1414.1 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/6-106.1)7    Sec. 6-106.1. School bus driver permit. 8    (a) The Secretary of State shall issue a school bus driver 9permit for the operation of first or second division vehicles 10being operated as school buses, or a permit valid only for the 11operation of first division vehicles being operated as school 12buses, or a school bus permit with a restriction valid for the 13operation of a first division vehicle being operated as a 14school bus or a multifunction school activity bus designed to 15carry up to 15 passengers, including the driver, when being 16used for curriculum-related activities as set forth in Section 1711-1414.1 of this Code, to those applicants who have met all 18the requirements of the application and screening process 19under this Section to insure the welfare and safety of 20children who are transported on school buses throughout the 21State of Illinois. Applicants shall obtain the proper 22application required by the Secretary of State from their 23prospective or current employer and submit the completed   HB2962 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10787 LNS 20867 b1application to the prospective or current employer along with 2the necessary fingerprint submission as required by the 3Illinois State Police to conduct fingerprint-based criminal 4background checks on current and future information available 5in the State system and current information available through 6the Federal Bureau of Investigation's system. Applicants who 7have completed the fingerprinting requirements shall not be 8subjected to the fingerprinting process when applying for 9subsequent permits or submitting proof of successful 10completion of the annual refresher course. Individuals who on 11July 1, 1995 (the effective date of Public Act 88-612) possess 12a valid school bus driver permit that has been previously 13issued by the appropriate Regional School Superintendent are 14not subject to the fingerprinting provisions of this Section 15as long as the permit remains valid and does not lapse. The 16applicant shall be required to pay all related application and 17fingerprinting fees as established by rule, including, but not 18limited to, the amounts established by the Illinois State 19Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation to process 20fingerprint-based criminal background investigations. All fees 21paid for fingerprint processing services under this Section 22shall be deposited into the State Police Services Fund for the 23cost incurred in processing the fingerprint-based criminal 24background investigations. All other fees paid under this 25Section shall be deposited into the Road Fund for the purpose 26of defraying the costs of the Secretary of State in   HB2962 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10787 LNS 20867 b1administering this Section. All applicants must: 2        1. be 21 years of age or older; 3        2. possess a valid and properly classified driver's 4    license issued by the Secretary of State; 5        3. possess a valid driver's license, which has not 6    been revoked, suspended, or canceled for 3 years 7    immediately prior to the date of application, or have not 8    had his or her commercial motor vehicle driving privileges 9    disqualified within the 3 years immediately prior to the 10    date of application; 11        4. successfully pass a first division or second 12    division written test, administered by the Secretary of 13    State, on school bus operation, school bus safety, and 14    special traffic laws relating to school buses and submit 15    to a review of the applicant's driving habits by the 16    Secretary of State at the time the written test is given; 17        5. demonstrate ability to exercise reasonable care in 18    the operation of school buses in accordance with rules 19    promulgated by the Secretary of State; 20        6. demonstrate physical fitness to operate school 21    buses by submitting the results of a medical examination, 22    including tests for drug use for each applicant not 23    subject to such testing pursuant to federal law, conducted 24    by a licensed physician, a licensed advanced practice 25    registered nurse, or a licensed physician assistant within 26    90 days of the date of application according to standards   HB2962 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 10787 LNS 20867 b1    promulgated by the Secretary of State; 2        7. affirm under penalties of perjury that he or she 3    has not made a false statement or knowingly concealed a 4    material fact in any application for permit; 5        8. have completed an initial classroom course, 6    including first aid procedures, in school bus driver 7    safety as promulgated by the Secretary of State and, after 8    satisfactory completion of said initial course, an annual 9    refresher course; such courses and the agency or 10    organization conducting such courses shall be approved by 11    the Secretary of State; failure to complete the annual 12    refresher course shall result in cancellation of the 13    permit until such course is completed; 14        9. not have been under an order of court supervision 15    for or convicted of 2 or more serious traffic offenses, as 16    defined by rule, within one year prior to the date of 17    application that may endanger the life or safety of any of 18    the driver's passengers within the duration of the permit 19    period; 20        10. not have been under an order of court supervision 21    for or convicted of reckless driving, aggravated reckless 22    driving, driving while under the influence of alcohol, 23    other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds or 24    any combination thereof, or reckless homicide resulting 25    from the operation of a motor vehicle within 3 years of the 26    date of application;   HB2962 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 10787 LNS 20867 b1        11. not have been convicted of committing or 2    attempting to commit any one or more of the following 3    offenses: (i) those offenses defined in Sections 8-1, 4    8-1.2, 9-1, 9-1.2, 9-2, 9-2.1, 9-3, 9-3.2, 9-3.3, 10-1, 5    10-2, 10-3.1, 10-4, 10-5, 10-5.1, 10-6, 10-7, 10-9, 6    11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.50, 11-1.60, 11-6, 11-6.5, 7    11-6.6, 11-9, 11-9.1, 11-9.1A, 11-9.3, 11-9.4, 11-9.4-1, 8    11-14, 11-14.1, 11-14.3, 11-14.4, 11-15, 11-15.1, 11-16, 9    11-17, 11-17.1, 11-18, 11-18.1, 11-19, 11-19.1, 11-19.2, 10    11-20, 11-20.1, 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, 11-20.4, 11-21, 11-22, 11    11-23, 11-24, 11-25, 11-26, 11-30, 12-2.6, 12-3.05, 12    12-3.1, 12-3.3, 12-4, 12-4.1, 12-4.2, 12-4.2-5, 12-4.3, 13    12-4.4, 12-4.5, 12-4.6, 12-4.7, 12-4.9, 12-5.3, 12-6, 14    12-6.2, 12-7.1, 12-7.3, 12-7.4, 12-7.5, 12-11, 12-13, 15    12-14, 12-14.1, 12-15, 12-16, 12-21.5, 12-21.6, 12-33, 16    12C-5, 12C-10, 12C-20, 12C-30, 12C-45, 16-16, 16-16.1, 17    18-1, 18-2, 18-3, 18-4, 18-5, 19-6, 20-1, 20-1.1, 20-1.2, 18    20-1.3, 20-2, 24-1, 24-1.1, 24-1.2, 24-1.2-5, 24-1.6, 19    24-1.7, 24-2.1, 24-3.3, 24-3.5, 24-3.8, 24-3.9, 31A-1.1, 20    33A-2, and 33D-1, in subsection (A), clauses (a) and (b), 21    of Section 24-3, and those offenses contained in Article 22    29D of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 23    2012; (ii) those offenses defined in the Cannabis Control 24    Act except those offenses defined in subsections (a) and 25    (b) of Section 4, and subsection (a) of Section 5 of the 26    Cannabis Control Act; (iii) those offenses defined in the   HB2962 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 10787 LNS 20867 b1    Illinois Controlled Substances Act; (iv) those offenses 2    defined in the Methamphetamine Control and Community 3    Protection Act; (v) any offense committed or attempted in 4    any other state or against the laws of the United States, 5    which if committed or attempted in this State would be 6    punishable as one or more of the foregoing offenses; (vi) 7    the offenses defined in Section 4.1 and 5.1 of the Wrongs 8    to Children Act or Section 11-9.1A of the Criminal Code of 9    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012; (vii) those offenses 10    defined in Section 6-16 of the Liquor Control Act of 1934; 11    and (viii) those offenses defined in the Methamphetamine 12    Precursor Control Act;13        12. not have been repeatedly involved as a driver in 14    motor vehicle collisions or been repeatedly convicted of 15    offenses against laws and ordinances regulating the 16    movement of traffic, to a degree which indicates lack of 17    ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable care in the 18    safe operation of a motor vehicle or disrespect for the 19    traffic laws and the safety of other persons upon the 20    highway; 21        13. not have, through the unlawful operation of a 22    motor vehicle, caused a crash resulting in the death of 23    any person; 24        14. not have, within the last 5 years, been adjudged 25    to be afflicted with or suffering from any mental 26    disability or disease;   HB2962 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 10787 LNS 20867 b1        15. consent, in writing, to the release of results of 2    reasonable suspicion drug and alcohol testing under 3    Section 6-106.1c of this Code by the employer of the 4    applicant to the Secretary of State; and5        16. not have been convicted of committing or 6    attempting to commit within the last 20 years: (i) an 7    offense defined in subsection (c) of Section 4, subsection 8    (b) of Section 5, and subsection (a) of Section 8 of the 9    Cannabis Control Act; or (ii) any offenses in any other 10    state or against the laws of the United States that, if 11    committed or attempted in this State, would be punishable 12    as one or more of the foregoing offenses. 13    (a-5) If an applicant's driver's license has been 14suspended within the 3 years immediately prior to the date of 15application for the sole reason of failure to pay child 16support, that suspension shall not bar the applicant from 17receiving a school bus driver permit. 18    (a-10) By January 1, 2024, the Secretary of State, in 19conjunction with the Illinois State Board of Education, shall 20develop a separate classroom course and refresher course for 21operation of vehicles of the first division being operated as 22school buses. Regional superintendents of schools, working 23with the Illinois State Board of Education, shall offer the 24course. 25    (b) A school bus driver permit shall be valid for a period 26specified by the Secretary of State as set forth by rule. It   HB2962 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 10787 LNS 20867 b1shall be renewable upon compliance with subsection (a) of this 2Section. 3    (c) A school bus driver permit shall contain the holder's 4driver's license number, legal name, residence address, zip 5code, and date of birth, a brief description of the holder, and 6a space for signature. The Secretary of State may require a 7suitable photograph of the holder. 8    (d) The employer shall be responsible for conducting a 9pre-employment interview with prospective school bus driver 10candidates, distributing school bus driver applications and 11medical forms to be completed by the applicant, and submitting 12the applicant's fingerprint cards to the Illinois State Police 13that are required for the criminal background investigations. 14The employer shall certify in writing to the Secretary of 15State that all pre-employment conditions have been 16successfully completed including the successful completion of 17an Illinois specific criminal background investigation through 18the Illinois State Police and the submission of necessary 19fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for 20criminal history information available through the Federal 21Bureau of Investigation system. The applicant shall present 22the certification to the Secretary of State at the time of 23submitting the school bus driver permit application. 24    (e) Permits shall initially be provisional upon receiving 25certification from the employer that all pre-employment 26conditions have been successfully completed, and upon   HB2962 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 10787 LNS 20867 b1successful completion of all training and examination 2requirements for the classification of the vehicle to be 3operated, the Secretary of State shall provisionally issue a 4School Bus Driver Permit. The permit shall remain in a 5provisional status pending the completion of the Federal 6Bureau of Investigation's criminal background investigation 7based upon fingerprinting specimens submitted to the Federal 8Bureau of Investigation by the Illinois State Police. The 9Federal Bureau of Investigation shall report the findings 10directly to the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State 11shall remove the bus driver permit from provisional status 12upon the applicant's successful completion of the Federal 13Bureau of Investigation's criminal background investigation. 14    (f) A school bus driver permit holder shall notify the 15employer and the Secretary of State if he or she is issued an 16order of court supervision for or convicted in another state 17of an offense that would make him or her ineligible for a 18permit under subsection (a) of this Section. The written 19notification shall be made within 5 days of the entry of the 20order of court supervision or conviction. Failure of the 21permit holder to provide the notification is punishable as a 22petty offense for a first violation and a Class B misdemeanor 23for a second or subsequent violation. 24    (g) Cancellation; suspension; notice and procedure. 25        (1) The Secretary of State shall cancel a school bus 26    driver permit of an applicant whose criminal background   HB2962 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 10787 LNS 20867 b1    investigation discloses that he or she is not in 2    compliance with the provisions of subsection (a) of this 3    Section. 4        (2) The Secretary of State shall cancel a school bus 5    driver permit when he or she receives notice that the 6    permit holder fails to comply with any provision of this 7    Section or any rule promulgated for the administration of 8    this Section. 9        (3) The Secretary of State shall cancel a school bus 10    driver permit if the permit holder's restricted commercial 11    or commercial driving privileges are withdrawn or 12    otherwise invalidated. 13        (4) The Secretary of State may not issue a school bus 14    driver permit for a period of 3 years to an applicant who 15    fails to obtain a negative result on a drug test as 16    required in item 6 of subsection (a) of this Section or 17    under federal law. 18        (5) The Secretary of State shall forthwith suspend a 19    school bus driver permit for a period of 3 years upon 20    receiving notice that the holder has failed to obtain a 21    negative result on a drug test as required in item 6 of 22    subsection (a) of this Section or under federal law. 23        (6) The Secretary of State shall suspend a school bus 24    driver permit for a period of 3 years upon receiving 25    notice from the employer that the holder failed to perform 26    the inspection procedure set forth in subsection (a) or   HB2962 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 10787 LNS 20867 b1    (b) of Section 12-816 of this Code. 2        (7) The Secretary of State shall suspend a school bus 3    driver permit for a period of 3 years upon receiving 4    notice from the employer that the holder refused to submit 5    to an alcohol or drug test as required by Section 6-106.1c 6    or has submitted to a test required by that Section which 7    disclosed an alcohol concentration of more than 0.00 or 8    disclosed a positive result on a National Institute on 9    Drug Abuse five-drug panel, utilizing federal standards 10    set forth in 49 CFR 40.87. 11    The Secretary of State shall notify the State 12Superintendent of Education and the permit holder's 13prospective or current employer that the applicant (1) has 14failed a criminal background investigation or (2) is no longer 15eligible for a school bus driver permit; and of the related 16cancellation of the applicant's provisional school bus driver 17permit. The cancellation shall remain in effect pending the 18outcome of a hearing pursuant to Section 2-118 of this Code. 19The scope of the hearing shall be limited to the issuance 20criteria contained in subsection (a) of this Section. A 21petition requesting a hearing shall be submitted to the 22Secretary of State and shall contain the reason the individual 23feels he or she is entitled to a school bus driver permit. The 24permit holder's employer shall notify in writing to the 25Secretary of State that the employer has certified the removal 26of the offending school bus driver from service prior to the   HB2962 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 10787 LNS 20867 b1start of that school bus driver's next work shift. An 2employing school board that fails to remove the offending 3school bus driver from service is subject to the penalties 4defined in Section 3-14.23 of the School Code. A school bus 5contractor who violates a provision of this Section is subject 6to the penalties defined in Section 6-106.11. 7    All valid school bus driver permits issued under this 8Section prior to January 1, 1995, shall remain effective until 9their expiration date unless otherwise invalidated. 10    (h) When a school bus driver permit holder who is a service 11member is called to active duty, the employer of the permit 12holder shall notify the Secretary of State, within 30 days of 13notification from the permit holder, that the permit holder 14has been called to active duty. Upon notification pursuant to 15this subsection, (i) the Secretary of State shall characterize 16the permit as inactive until a permit holder renews the permit 17as provided in subsection (i) of this Section, and (ii) if a 18permit holder fails to comply with the requirements of this 19Section while called to active duty, the Secretary of State 20shall not characterize the permit as invalid. 21    (i) A school bus driver permit holder who is a service 22member returning from active duty must, within 90 days, renew 23a permit characterized as inactive pursuant to subsection (h) 24of this Section by complying with the renewal requirements of 25subsection (b) of this Section. 26    (j) For purposes of subsections (h) and (i) of this   HB2962 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 10787 LNS 20867 b1Section: 2    "Active duty" means active duty pursuant to an executive 3order of the President of the United States, an act of the 4Congress of the United States, or an order of the Governor. 5    "Service member" means a member of the Armed Services or 6reserve forces of the United States or a member of the Illinois 7National Guard. 8    (k) A private carrier employer of a school bus driver 9permit holder, having satisfied the employer requirements of 10this Section, shall be held to a standard of ordinary care for 11intentional acts committed in the course of employment by the 12bus driver permit holder. This subsection (k) shall in no way 13limit the liability of the private carrier employer for 14violation of any provision of this Section or for the 15negligent hiring or retention of a school bus driver permit 16holder. 17    (l) The Secretary may adopt rules to implement this 18Section. 19(Source: P.A. 102-168, eff. 7-27-21; 102-299, eff. 8-6-21; 20102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-726, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 215-13-22; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 102-1130, eff. 7-1-23; 103-605, 22eff. 7-1-24; 103-825, eff. 1-1-25.) 23    (625 ILCS 5/11-1414.1)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-1414.1)24    Sec. 11-1414.1. School transportation of students. 25    (a) Every student enrolled in grade 12 or below in any   HB2962 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 10787 LNS 20867 b1entity listed in subsection (a) of Section 1-182 of this Code 2must be transported in a school bus or a vehicle described in 3subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (b) of Section 1-182 of 4this Code for any curriculum-related school activity, except a 5student in any of grades 9 through 12 or a student in any of 6grades K through 12 with an Individualized Education Plan 7(IEP) with a staff to student ratio of 1 to 5, and attending 8Acacia Academy, Alexander Leigh, Marklund, Helping Hands 9Center, Connections Organization, Soaring Eagle Academy, or 10New Horizon Academy may be transported in a multifunction 11multi-function school activity bus (MFSAB) as defined in 12Section 1-148.3a-5 of this Code for any curriculum-related 13activity except for transportation on regular bus routes from 14home to school or from school to home. The use of a MFSAB for 15curriculum-related activities is , subject to the following 16conditions:17        (i) A MFSAB may not be used to transport students 18    under this Section unless the driver holds a valid school 19    bus driver permit.20        (ii) The use of a MFSAB under this Section is subject 21    to the requirements of Sections 6-106.11, 6-106.12, 22    12-707.01, 13-101, and 13-109 of this Code.23    "Curriculum-related school activity" as used in this 24subsection (a) includes transportation from home to school or 25from school to home, tripper or shuttle service between school 26attendance centers, transportation to a vocational or career   HB2962 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 10787 LNS 20867 b1center or other trade-skill development site or a regional 2safe school or other school-sponsored alternative learning 3program, or a trip that is directly related to the regular 4curriculum of a student for which he or she earns credit.5    (b) Every student enrolled in grade 12 or below in any 6entity listed in subsection (a) of Section 1-182 of this Code 7who is transported in a vehicle that is being operated by or 8for a public or private primary or secondary school, including 9any primary or secondary school operated by a religious 10institution, for an interscholastic, 11interscholastic-athletic, or school-sponsored, 12noncurriculum-related activity that (i) does not require 13student participation as part of the educational services of 14the entity and (ii) is not associated with the students' 15regular class-for-credit schedule shall transport students 16only in a school bus or vehicle described in subsection (b) of 17Section 1-182 of this Code. A student participating in an 18agrarian-related activity may also be transported in a second 19division pick-up truck registered under paragraph 7 of 20subsection (b) of Section 3-808.1. For purposes of this 21subsection, "pick-up truck" means a truck weighing 12,000 22pounds or less with an enclosed cabin that can seat up to 6 23passengers with seatbelts, including the driver, and an open 24cargo area. This subsection (b) does not apply to any second 25division vehicle used by an entity listed in subsection (a) of 26Section 1-182 of this Code for a parade, homecoming, or a   HB2962 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 10787 LNS 20867 b1similar noncurriculum-related school activity.2(Source: P.A. 102-544, eff. 8-20-21.) 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 42026.